Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 44.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-2,139
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature
finds and declares that all students have a right to work and study in a safe,
supportive environment that is free from harassment, intimidation, and violence.
The Legislature further finds that when a student is a victim of dating violence,
his or her academic life suffers and his or her safety at school is jeopardized.
The Legislature therefor finds and declares that a policy to create a better
understanding and awareness of dating violence shall be adopted by each school
district. It is the intent of the Legislature to require each school district
to establish a policy for educating staff and students about dating violence.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 44.